Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3413
Vehicle; responsibilities of program and owner.

(1) At the time an owner makes a vehicle available for use by a program and immediately prior to each time the owner offers such vehicle for use by such program, the program shall:

(a) Verify that the vehicle does not have any safety recalls for which the repairs have not been made; and

(b) Notify the owner of the requirements under subsection (2) of this section.

(2) An owner shall:

(a) Not make a vehicle available for use through a program if the owner has received actual notice of a safety recall on such vehicle until the safety recall repair has been made;

(b) Upon receipt of actual notice of a safety recall on a vehicle when such vehicle is offered for use through a program, remove the vehicle from availability as soon as practicably possible and until the safety recall repair has been made; and

(c) Upon receipt of actual notice of a safety recall on a vehicle, and when the vehicle is in the possession of a driver, notify the program of the safety recall so that the program may notify the driver and the vehicle can be removed from use until the owner makes the necessary safety recall repair.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 13.